Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2533YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 733 Section 1. Section 321.376, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. A person applying for employment or employed as a 3 school bus driver shall successfully complete a department 4 of education approved course of instruction for school bus 5 drivers before or within the first six months of employment 6 and at least every twenty-four months thereafter. If an 7 employee fails to provide an employer with a certificate of 8 completion of the required school bus driverâs course, the 9 driverâs employer shall report the failure to the department of 10 education and the employeeâs authorization to operate a school 11 bus shall be revoked. The department of education shall send 12 notice of the revocation to both the employee and the employer. 13 A person whose school bus authorization has been revoked under 14 this section shall not be issued another authorization until 15 certification of the completion of an approved school bus 16 driverâs course is received by the department of education. 17 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , a person who has 18 successfully completed a department of education approved 19 course of instruction for school bus drivers within the 20 previous twenty-four months shall not be required to complete 21 the course again before or within six months of becoming 22 employed as a school bus driver at a different school district, 23 provided the person complies with subsection 1 and completes 24 the course again within twenty-four months of the prior 25 completion. 26